Hawaii statutes.
[§291E-2] Medical services. The
several county and state government physicians shall, or any other qualified
person may, make whatever tests and analyses as may be requested of them by any
law enforcement officer in connection with the determination of whether a
person is or was under the influence of an intoxicant or has consumed a
measurable amount of alcohol for any purpose under this chapter. [L 2000, c
189, pt of §23]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next